New Jersey, session 222, A3303.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  As used in this act: Discharged LGBTQ veteran means a veteran who was discharged less than honorably from the Armed Forces of the United States due to their sexual orientation or gender identity or expression, or statements, consensual sexual conduct, or consensual acts relating to sexual orientation or gender identity or expression, or the disclosure of such statements, conduct, or acts that were prohibited by the Armed Forces at the time of discharge. Gender expression means a person's gender-related appearance and behavior, whether or not stereotypically associated with the person's assigned sex at birth. Gender identity means a person's internal sense of their own gender, regardless of the sex the person was assigned at birth. Sexual orientation means male or female heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality by inclination, practice, identity, or expression, having a history thereof or being perceived, presumed, or identified by others as having such an orientation. 2.    (New section)  The department shall establish a consistent and uniform process to determine whether a veteran qualifies as a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c. (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), including, at a minimum, standards for verifying a veteran's status as a discharged LGBTQ veteran, and a method of demonstrating eligibility as a discharged LGBTQ veteran.  The department shall create an eligibility form to be issued upon verification of status as a discharged LGBTQ veteran. 3.    Section 1 of P.L.1983, c.197 (C.10:5-39) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: a.     "Affirmative action program for veterans" means a plan guaranteeing to veterans an equal employment opportunity, which includes but is not limited to the following areas: recruitment, selection, hiring, training, promotion, transfer, layoff, return from layoff, compensation, and fringe benefits. b.    "Public works contract" means any contract exceeding $250,000.00 in price to be performed for or on behalf of the State for the construction, alteration, or repair of any building or public work. c.     "Veteran " means any soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk, who has served at least 90 days in the active military, naval or air service of the United States and has been discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), who has served at least 90 days of active service, and who has presented to the Civil Service Commission of New Jersey full and convincing evidence of such record of service on or before the date of making application for a position governed by this act.  The 90-day requirement for active service is exclusive of any time such veteran was assigned: (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of his civilian course and was pursued to completion; or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army or Air Force National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual, service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not he has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided. (cf: P.L.2017, c.184, s.5) 4.    N.J.S.11A:5-1 is amended to read as follows: 11A:5-1.     As used in this chapter: a.     "Disabled veteran" means any veteran who is eligible to be compensated for a service-connected disability from war service by the United States Veterans Administration or who receives or is entitled to receive equivalent compensation for a service-connected disability which arises out of military or naval service as set forth in this chapter and who has submitted sufficient evidence of the record of disability incurred in the line of duty to the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs and received a determination of status no later than eight days prior to the issuance of an employment list, for which that individual received a passing score on an examination; b.    "Veteran" means any honorably discharged soldier, sailor, marine or nurse who served in any army or navy of the allies of the United States in World War I, between July 14, 1914 and November 11, 1918, or who served in any army or navy of the allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939 and September 2, 1945 and who was inducted into that service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of the enlistment, and who did not renounce or lose his or her United States citizenship; or any soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has been discharged or released under other than dishonorable conditions from that service, or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L. , c. (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from  active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United  States, in any of the following wars or conflicts and who has presented to the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs sufficient evidence of the record of service and received a determination of status no later than eight days prior to the issuance of an employment list, for which that individual received a passing score on an examination: (1) World War I, between April 6, 1917 and November 11, 1918; (2) World War II, on or after September 16, 1940, who shall have served at least 90 days beginning on or before December 31, 1946 in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies; except that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service; (3) Korean conflict, on or after June 23, 1950, who shall have served at least 90 days beginning on or before January 31, 1955 in active service, exclusive of any period of assignment for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies; except that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service; (4) Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 1, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (5) Vietnam conflict, on or after December 31, 1960, who shall have served at least 90 days beginning on or before May 7, 1975 in active service, exclusive of any period of assignment for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, or exclusive of any service performed pursuant to enlistment in the National Guard or the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; except that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as provided; (6) Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (7) Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (8) Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (9) Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (10) Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (11) Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992 or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or the Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (12) Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (13) Operation "Uphold Democracy" in Haiti, on or after September 19, 1994, who served in Haiti or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1995 and who received an Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal for such service; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided or received an Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal; (14) Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15) Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (16) In a campaign or expedition for which a medal has been authorized and recognized by the Veterans' Preference Act of 1944, as amended and codified under Title 5, United States Code, for civil service preference and which has been awarded to the veteran. c.     "War service" means service by a veteran in any war or conflict described in this chapter during the periods specified. (cf: P.L. 2021, c.429, s.1) 5.    Section 1 of P.L.2007, c.275 (C.13:1L-12.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  (1)  The department shall not charge an admission fee for entrance into a State park or forest by any veteran during an event held by a veterans' organization.  In addition, the department shall not charge a facilities fee of any kind to any veterans' organization using a State park or forest for an event. (2)   The department shall not charge an admission fee or facilities fee of any kind for entrance into a State park or forest by a person holding a driver's license or identification card with a Gold Star Family designation issued pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.165 (C.39:3-10f6) or section 2 of P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.3), respectively. b.    As used in this section: "Veteran" means any resident of the State now or hereafter who has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard of this State or another state as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits; and "Veterans' organization" means the American Legion, Veterans of Foreign Wars, or other veterans' organizations chartered under federal law, or any service foundation of such an organization recognized in its bylaws. (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.1) 6.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.297 (C.18A:36-13.2) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any pupil of a public school who is absent from school on November 11, Veterans Day, attending a ceremony honoring a veteran or a member of the United States Armed Forces or the New Jersey National Guard returning from overseas deployments, or assisting a veteran at a hospital, food shelter, or any similar facility, shall have the absence for those reasons recorded as an excused absence on the pupil's attendance record or on that of any group or class of which he is a member. Any transcript, application, employment form, or any similar form on which information concerning a pupil's attendance record is requested shall show, with respect to absences, only absences other than excused absences authorized pursuant to this subsection.  In making a determination on whether or not a student has a perfect attendance record for the school year, a school district shall not consider as an absence an excused absence authorized pursuant to this subsection. b.    A pupil shall provide such documentation as the superintendent or administrative principal of the school district deems necessary to prove the pupil meets the requirements for the excused absence under subsection a. of this section. c.     As used in this section, "veteran" means a person who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States. (cf: P.L.2015, c.297, s.1) 7.    Section 2 of P.L.2015, c.32 (C.18A:62-4.1b) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  A veteran or covered individual who is living in New Jersey and is attending a public institution of higher education in New Jersey shall be regarded as a resident of the State for the purpose of determining tuition, regardless of the veteran or covered individual's state of residence. b.   As used in this section: "Covered individual" means: (1)   an individual who is entitled to educational assistance under provisions of the federal "Post-9/11 Educational Assistance" program (38 U.S.C. s.3311(b)(9) or 3319) by virtue of such individual's relationship to a veteran ; and (2)   an individual who is entitled to educational assistance under provisions of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs' "Vocational Rehabilitation and Employment Program" (38 U.S.C. s.3100 et seq.) effective for courses, semesters, or terms that begin after March 1, 2019. "Veteran" means a person who has served on active duty in the Uniformed Services of the United States and who was discharged or released, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), who has served on active duty in the Uniformed Services of the United States, and who qualifies for educational assistance under the federal "All-Volunteer Force Educational Assistance Program" (38 U.S.C. s.3001 et seq.) or "Post-9/11 Educational Assistance" program (38 U.S.C. s.3301 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2019, c.264, s.1) 8.    N.J.S.18A:66-2 is amended to read as follows: 18A:66-2.     As used in this article: a.     "Accumulated deductions" means the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the compensation of a member or contributed by or in behalf of the member, including interest credited to January 1, 1956, standing to the credit of the member's individual account in the annuity savings fund. b.    "Annuity" means payments for life derived from the accumulated deductions of a member as provided in this article. c.     "Beneficiary" means any person receiving a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided in this article. d.    (1) "Compensation" means the contractual salary, for services as a teacher as defined in this article, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular school day or the regular school year. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, "compensation" means the amount of the contractual salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as a teacher as defined in this article, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular school day or the regular school year. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who at the time of enrollment in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 transfers service credit from another State-administered retirement system pursuant to N.J.S.18A:66-15.1, but shall apply to a former member of the retirement system who has been granted a retirement allowance and is reenrolled in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 pursuant to N.J.S.18A:66-53.2 after becoming employed again in a position that makes the person eligible to be a member of the retirement system. For the period of July 1, 2009 through June 30, 2011, "contractual salary" for State employees shall include wage increases under a collective negotiations agreement notwithstanding that, by amendment to that collective negotiations agreement, the effective date of the contractual increase has been deferred.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "State employee" means an employee in the Executive Branch of State government of New Jersey. e.     "Employer" means the State, the board of education or any educational institution or agency of or within the State by which a teacher is paid. f.     (1) "Final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the three years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the five years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any five fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. g.    "Fiscal year" means any year commencing with July 1, and ending with June 30, next following. h.    "Pension" means payments for life derived from appropriations made by the State or employers to the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund. i.     "Annuity reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of an annuity, granted under the provisions of this article, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. j.     "Pension reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of a pension granted to a member from the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. k.    "Present-entrant" means any member of the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund who had established status as a "present-entrant member" of said fund prior to January 1, 1956. l.     "Rate of contribution initially certified" means the rate of contribution certified by the retirement system in accordance with N.J.S.18A:66-29. m.   "Regular interest" shall mean interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Directors of the Divisions of Investment and Pensions, the board of trustees and the actuary. It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus [3%] three percent, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below [6%] six percent. n.    "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. o.    "School service" means any service as a "teacher" as defined in this section. p.    "Teacher" means any regular teacher, special teacher, helping teacher, teacher clerk, principal, vice-principal, supervisor, supervising principal, director, superintendent, city superintendent, assistant city superintendent, county superintendent, State Commissioner or Assistant Commissioner of Education, members of the State Department of Education who are certificated, unclassified professional staff and other members of the teaching or professional staff of any class, public school, renaissance school project established pursuant to P.L.2011, c.176 (C.18A:36C-1 et seq.) upon commencement of employment, high school, normal school, model school, training school, vocational school, truant reformatory school, or parental school, and of any and all classes or schools within the State conducted under the order and superintendence, and wholly or partly at the expense of the State Board of Education, of a duly elected or appointed board of education, board of school directors, or board of trustees of the State or of any school district or normal school district thereof, and any persons under contract or engagement to perform one or more of these functions. It shall also mean any person who serves, while on an approved leave of absence from regular duties as a teacher, as an officer of a local, county or State labor organization which represents, or is affiliated with an organization which represents, teachers as defined in this subsection. No person shall be deemed a teacher within the meaning of this article who is a substitute teacher. In all cases of doubt the board of trustees shall determine whether any person is a teacher as defined in this article. q.    "Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund," hereinafter referred to as the "retirement system" or "system," is the corporate name of the arrangement for the payment of retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this article, including the several funds placed under said system. By that name all its business shall be transacted, its funds invested, warrants for money drawn, and payments made and all of its cash and securities and other property held. r.     "Veteran" means any honorably discharged officer, soldier, sailor, airman, marine or nurse who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War I between July 14, 1914, and November 11, 1918, or who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who was inducted into such service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of such enlistment, and who did not, during or by reason of such service, renounce or lose United States citizenship, and any officer, soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, in any of the following wars, uprisings, insurrections, expeditions or emergencies, and who has presented to the retirement system evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to said retirement system: (1)   The Indian wars and uprisings during any of the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as periods of active hostility; (2)   The Spanish-American War between April 20, 1898, and April 11, 1899; (3)   The Philippine insurrections and expeditions during the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as of active hostility from February 4, 1899, to the end of 1913; (4)   The Peking relief expedition between June 20, 1900, and May 27, 1902; (5)   The army of Cuban occupation between July 18, 1898, and May 20, 1902; (6)   The army of Cuban pacification between October 6, 1906, and April 1, 1909; (7)   The Mexican punitive expedition between March 14, 1916, and February 7, 1917; (8)   The Mexican border patrol, having actually participated in engagements against Mexicans between April 12, 1911, and June 16, 1919; (9)   World War I, between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918; (10)    World War II, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (11)    Korean conflict on or after June 23, 1950, and on or prior to January 31, 1955, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; and provided further that any member classed as a veteran pursuant to this subsection prior to August 1, 1966, shall continue to be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person completed the 90-day service between said dates as herein provided; (12)    Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 1, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (13)    Vietnam conflict, on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (14)    Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15)    Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (16)    Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (17)    Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (18)    Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of the operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (19)    Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (20)    Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (21)    Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (22)    Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided. "Veteran" also means any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits. s.     "Child" means a deceased member's unmarried child either (a) under the age of 18 or (b) of any age who, at the time of the member's death, is disabled because of mental retardation or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and the impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. t.     (1) "Widower," for employees of the State, means the man to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of her death and who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower will be considered terminated by marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widower," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the man to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married until the date of her death and who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower shall be considered terminated by marriage of the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. u.    (1)  "Widow," for employees of the State, means the woman to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of his death and who was receiving at least one-half of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow will be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widow," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the woman to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married until the date of his death and who was receiving at least one-half of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow shall be considered terminated by the marriage of the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. v.    "Parent" means the parent of a member who was receiving at least one-half of the parent's support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. w.   "Medical board" means the board of physicians provided for in N.J.S.18A:66-56. x.    (1)  "Spouse," for employees of the State, means the husband or wife, or domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), of a member. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, "spouse," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the husband or wife of a member. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "spouse" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. (cf: P.L.2018, c.129, s.1) 9.    Section 3 of P.L.2009, c.279 (C.18A:75A-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Article II: Definitions As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires a different construction: a.     "Active duty" means full-time duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. ss.1209 and 1211. b.    "Children of military families" means a school-aged child or children, enrolled in Kindergarten through Twelfth grade, in the household of an active duty member. c.     "Compact commissioner" means the voting representative of each compacting state appointed pursuant to Article VIII of this compact. d.    "Deployment" means the period one month prior to the service members' departure from their home station on military orders through six months after return to their home station. e.     "Education or educational records" means those official records, files, and data directly related to a student and maintained by the school or local education agency, including but not limited to records encompassing all the material kept in the student's cumulative folder such as general identifying data, records of attendance and of academic work completed, records of achievement and results of evaluative tests, health data, disciplinary status, test protocols, and individualized education programs. f.     "Extracurricular activities" means a voluntary activity sponsored by the school or local education agency or an organization sanctioned by the local education agency. Extracurricular activities include, but are not limited to, preparation for and involvement in public performances, contests, athletic competitions, demonstrations, displays, and club activities. g.    "Interstate Commission on Educational Opportunity for Military Children" means the commission that is created under Article IX of this compact, which is generally referred to as the Interstate Commission. h.    "Local education agency" means a public authority legally constituted by the state as an administrative agency to provide control of and direction for Kindergarten through Twelfth grade public educational institutions. i.     "Member state" means a state that has enacted this compact. j.     "Military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the Department of Defense, including any leased facility, which is located within any of the several States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianas Islands and any other U.S. Territory. Such term does not include any facility used primarily for civil works, rivers and harbors projects, or flood control projects. k.    "Non-member state" means a state that has not enacted this compact. l.     "Receiving state" means the state to which a child of a military family is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought. m.   "Rule" means a written statement by the Interstate Commission promulgated pursuant to Article XII of this compact that is of general applicability, implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of the Compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the Interstate Commission, and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule. n.    "Sending state" means the state from which a child of a military family is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought. o.    "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianas Islands and any other U.S. Territory. p.    "Student" means the child of a military family for whom the local education agency receives public funding and who is formally enrolled in Kindergarten through Twelfth grade. q.    "Transition" means (1) the formal and physical process of transferring from school to school or (2) the period of time in which a student moves from one school in the sending state to another school in the receiving state. r.     "Uniformed service or services" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard as well as the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and Public Health Services. s.     "Veteran" means a person who served in the [uniformed services] Uniformed Services of the United States and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2009, c.279, s.3) 10.  Section 4 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  The Workforce Development Partnership Program is hereby established in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and shall be administered by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development.  The purpose of the program is to provide qualified displaced, disadvantaged and employed workers with the employment and training services most likely to enable the individual to obtain employment providing self-sufficiency for the individual and also to provide the greatest opportunity for long-range career advancement with high levels of productivity and earning power.  To implement that purpose, the program shall provide those services by means of training grants or customized training services in coordination with funding for the services from federal or other sources.  The commissioner is authorized to expend moneys from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund to provide the training grants or customized training services and provide for each of the following: (1)   The cost of counseling required pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-7), to the extent that adequate funding for counseling is not available from federal or other sources; (2)   Reasonable administrative costs, which shall not exceed 10 percent of the revenues collected pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1992, c.44 (C.34:15D-13) during any fiscal year ending before July 1, 2001, except for additional start-up administrative costs approved by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget during the first year of the program's operation; (3)   Reasonable costs, which shall not exceed 0.5 percent of the revenues collected pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1992, c.44 (C.34:15D-13) during any fiscal year ending before July 1, 2001, as required by the State Employment and Training Commission to design criteria and conduct an annual evaluation of the program; and (4)   The cost of reimbursement to individuals for excess contributions pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1992, c.44 (C.34:15D-17). b.    Not more than 10 percent of the moneys received by any service provider pursuant to this act shall be expended on anything other than direct costs to the provider of providing the employment and training services, which direct costs shall not include any administrative or overhead expense of the provider. c.     Training and employment services or other workforce investment services shall be provided to a worker who receives counseling pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-7) only if the counselor who evaluates the worker pursuant to that section determines that the worker can reasonably be expected to successfully complete the training and instruction identified in the Employability Development Plan developed pursuant to that section for the worker. d.    All occupational training provided under this act: (1)   Shall be training which is likely to substantially enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power; and (2)   Shall be training for a labor demand occupation, except for: (a)   Customized training provided to the present employees of a business which the commissioner deems to be in need of the training to prevent job loss caused by obsolete skills, technological change or national or global competition; or (b)   Customized training provided to employees at a facility which is being relocated from another state into New Jersey; or (c)   Entrepreneurial training and technical assistance supported by training grants provided pursuant to subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-6). e.     During any fiscal year ending before July 1, 2001, not less than 25 percent of the total revenues dedicated to the program during any one fiscal year shall be reserved to provide employment and training services for qualified displaced workers; not less than six percent of the total revenues dedicated to the program during any one fiscal year shall be reserved to provide employment and training services for qualified disadvantaged workers; not less than 45 percent of the total revenues dedicated to the program during any one fiscal year shall be reserved for and appropriated to the Office of Customized Training; not less than three percent of the total revenues dedicated to the program during any one fiscal year shall be reserved for occupational safety and health training; and five percent of the total revenues dedicated to the program during any one fiscal year shall be reserved for and appropriated to the Youth Transitions to Work Partnership created pursuant to P.L.1993, c.268 (C.34:15E-1 et seq.). f.     Funds available under the program shall not be used for activities which induce, encourage or assist: any displacement of currently employed workers by trainees, including partial displacement by means such as reduced hours of currently employed workers; any replacement of laid off workers by trainees; or any relocation of operations resulting in a loss of employment at a previous workplace located in the State. g.    On-the-job training shall not be funded by the program for any employment found by the commissioner to be of a level of skill and complexity too low to merit training.  The duration of on-the-job training funded by the program for any worker shall not exceed the duration indicated by the Bureau of Labor Statistics' Occupational Information Network, or "O*NET," for the occupation for which the training is provided and shall in no case exceed 26 weeks.  The department shall set the duration of on-the-job training for a worker for less than the indicated maximum, when training for the maximum duration is not warranted because of the level of the individual's previous training, education or work experience. On-the-job training shall not be funded by the program unless it is accompanied, concurrently or otherwise, by whatever amount of classroom-based or equivalent occupational training, remedial instruction or both, is deemed appropriate for the worker by the commissioner.  On-the-job training shall not be funded by the program unless the trainee is provided benefits, pay and working conditions at a level and extent not less than the benefits and working conditions of other trainees or employees of the trainee's employer with comparable skills, responsibilities, experience and seniority. h.    Employment and training services funded by the program shall not replace, supplant, compete with or duplicate in any way approved apprenticeship programs. i.     No activities funded by the program shall impair existing contracts for services or collective bargaining agreements, except that activities which would be inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement may be undertaken with the written concurrence of the collective bargaining unit and employer who are parties to the agreement. j.     All staff who are hired and supported by moneys from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, including any of those staff located at any One Stop Career Center, but not including any staff of a service provider providing employment and training services supported by a customized training grant pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-5) or an individual training grant pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-6), shall be hired and employed by the State pursuant to Title 11A, Civil Service, of the New Jersey Statutes, be hired and employed by a political subdivision of the State, or be qualified staff hired and employed by a non-profit organization which began functioning as the One Stop Career Center operator with the written consent of the chief elected official and the commissioner prior to the effective date of P.L.2004, c.39 (C.34:1A-1.2 et al.), or be qualified staff hired and employed by an approved community-based or faith-based organization to provide services at the level of staffing provided in an agreement entered into by the organization before the effective date of P.L.2004, c.39 (C.34:1A-1.2 et al.). k.    Employers in the State who apply for grants for training and employment services or other workforce investment services for their employees in the State shall be evaluated by the commissioner and preference shall be given to those employers who: (1)   provide equipment, supplies, or services to military bases and installations pursuant to a procurement or military contract with the United States Department of Defense, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or any branch of the United States Armed Forces; (2)   are engaged in one or more of the following fields or industries: science, technology, engineering, mathematics, or advanced manufacturing within these fields or industries; (3)   are manufacturers; or (4)   intend to train veterans. Pursuant to this paragraph, "veteran" means any resident of the State now or hereafter who has served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof or the National Guard of this State or another state as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), and has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions from that service, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.2) 11.  Section 1 of P.L.1989, c.162 (C.38A:3-6.3) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act, unless otherwise indicated by the context: a.     "Adjutant General" means the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs. b.    "Advisory council" means the advisory council of a veterans' facility or of the veterans' cemetery. c.     "Member" means a person admitted to and receiving care in a veterans' facility. d.    "Veteran" means a person who has been honorably discharged from the active military service of the United States, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from the active military service of the United States. e.     "Veterans' facility" means any home, institution, hospital, or part thereof, the admission to which is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs. (cf: P.L.1989, c.162, s.1) 12.  Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.165 (C.39:3-10f6) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  (1)  In addition to the requirements for the form and content of a motor vehicle driver's license under R.S.39:3-10 and a probationary license issued under section 4 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.4), the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall, upon submission of satisfactory proof, designate on an initial license, renewal license, or probationary license, as appropriate, that the license holder is a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States of America or the New Jersey National Guard. The designation of veteran status on an initial license, renewal license, or probationary license shall not be deemed sufficient valid proof of veteran status for official governmental purposes when any other statute, or any regulation or other directive of a governmental entity, requires documentation of veteran status. (2)   In addition to the requirements for the form and content of a motor vehicle driver's license under R.S.39:3-10 and a probationary license issued under section 4 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.4), the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall, upon submission of satisfactory proof, designate on an initial license, renewal license, or probationary license, as appropriate, that the license holder is a Gold Star Family member. The commission shall provide to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs personal identifying information of any person issued a driver's license with a Gold Star Family designation pursuant to this section. b.    For the purpose of this section: "Gold Star Family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, partner in a civil union, parent, brother, sister, child, legal guardian, or other legal custodian, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption, of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard, who lost his or her life while on active duty for the United States. "Veteran" means any resident of the State now or hereafter who has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard of this State or another state as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States. "Satisfactory proof" means, in the case of a veteran, the applicant's DD-214, DD-215, or DD-256 form as issued by the federal government, NGB-22 or other approved separation forms as outlined by all branches of the Armed Forces, or federal activation orders showing service under Title 10, section 672 or section 12301, of the United States Code, or a county-issued veteran identification card pursuant to P.L.2012, c.30 (C.40A:9-78.1 et seq.), or a veteran identification card as issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs under the "Veterans Identification Card Act of 2015" (38 U.S.C. s.5706). In the case of a discharged LGBTQ veteran, satisfactory proof also includes a copy of the eligibility form issued by the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). In the case of a Gold Star Family member, satisfactory proof includes any or all of the following: (1)   a certification from the Department of New Jersey of American Gold Star Mothers, Inc., or any other organization formed for the support of family members of members of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard, who lost their lives while on active duty for the United States, that the applicant is either the spouse, domestic partner, partner in a civil union, parent, brother, sister, child, legal guardian, or other legal custodian, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption, of a member of the armed forces or National Guard who died while on active duty for the United States; or (2)   (a) documentation deemed acceptable by the Adjutant General, including, but not limited to, an NGB-22, a federal DD Form 1300, Report of Casualty, or a federal DD Form 2064, Certificate of Death Overseas, which identifies the member of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard who died while on active duty for the United States; and (b)   documentation indicating the applicant's relationship to the service member. (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.4) 13.  Section 2 of P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.3) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  (1)  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall issue an identification card to any resident of the State who is 14 years of age or older and who is not the holder of a valid permit or basic driver's license. The identification card shall attest to the true name, correct age, and veteran status, upon submission of satisfactory proof, by any veteran, and shall contain other identifying data as certified by the applicant for such identification card. Every application for an identification card shall be signed and verified by the applicant and shall be accompanied by the written consent of at least one parent or the person's legal guardian if the person is under 17 years of age and shall be supported by such documentary evidence of the age, identity, and veteran status, or blindness, or disability of such person as the chief administrator may require. A person issued an identification card pursuant to this section may be issued a standard identification card or a REAL ID identification card.  The chief administrator shall require any applicant for a standard identification card to provide as proof of the applicant's identity, age, and residence primary and secondary documents, with which the chief administrator shall attribute point values in accordance with the point based identification verification program established pursuant to section 28 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-28).  The point total required to prove the identity of an applicant for the standard probationary license shall be the same for every applicant, regardless of immigration status.  In the event that the commission changes the point total threshold, the requirement that every applicant reach the same point total threshold shall remain in effect. In addition to requiring an applicant for an identification card to submit satisfactory proof of identity, age, and, if appropriate, veteran status, the chief administrator also shall require the applicant to provide: (a)   as a condition for obtaining a standard identification card, proof of the applicant's social security number and one document providing satisfactory proof that the applicant is a New Jersey resident.  If the applicant does not have a social security number, the applicant shall either: (i)    provide satisfactory proof of an Individual Taxpayer Identification Number; or (ii)   indicate, in a manner prescribed by the commission and consistent with all other provisions of P.L.2019, c.271 (C.39:3-10o et al.), that the applicant is not eligible to receive a social security number; or (b)   as a condition for obtaining a REAL ID identification card: two documents providing satisfactory proof that the applicant is a New Jersey resident; proof of the applicant's social security number or verification of ineligibility for a social security number in accordance with the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder; and proof that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. Any documents and personal information, including an applicant's photograph, obtained by the commission from an applicant for a standard identification card shall be confidential, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission for any purposes related to Title 8 of the United States Code without the informed consent of the applicant, a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, or a lawful court order or subpoena; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or in any way restrict, any action where such prohibition or restriction would be contrary to federal law; and except that information under this subsection may be shared in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9).  When responding to a warrant, court order, or subpoena, the commission may disclose only those records or information specifically requested in the warrant, court order, or subpoena. Possession of a standard identification card issued pursuant to this section shall not be considered evidence of an individual's citizenship or immigration status and shall not be used as a basis for an investigation, arrest, citation, prosecution, or detention. Information regarding an applicant's Individual Tax Identification Number, social security number, or ineligibility to receive a social security number obtained by the commission for the issuance of a standard identification card pursuant to this section, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission except where: (1) required by section 11 of P.L.1998, c.1 (C.2A:17-56.60); (2) the applicant provides written informed consent to the disclosure; (3) the requesting entity presents a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, a lawful court order, or a subpoena; (4) required by State or federal law, and to the extent that the disclosure may be necessary to permit the State to participate in the National Driver Register program, as set forth in 49 U.S.C. s.30301 et seq.; (5) the disclosure is in connection with an audit or investigation of identity fraud, driver's license fraud, or non-driver identification card fraud; or (6) consistent with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9). If the chief administrator has reasonable cause to suspect that any document presented by an applicant pursuant to this section is altered, false or otherwise invalid, the chief administrator shall refuse to grant the identification card until such time as the document may be verified by the issuing agency to the chief administrator's satisfaction. A person violating this section shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days. (2)   In addition to the requirements for the form and content of an identification card pursuant to this section, the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall, upon submission of satisfactory proof, designate on an identification card that the card holder is a Gold Star Family member.  The commission shall provide to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs personal identifying information for any person issued an identification card with a Gold Star Family designation pursuant to this section. b.    The designation of veteran status on an identification card shall not be deemed sufficient valid proof of veteran status for official governmental purposes when any other statute, or any regulation or other directive of a governmental entity, requires documentation of veteran status. c.     For the purpose of this section: "Gold Star Family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, partner in a civil union, parent, brother, sister, child, legal guardian, or other legal custodian, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption, of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard, who lost his or her life while on active duty for the United States. "REAL ID identification card" shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.39:1-1. "Veteran" means any resident of the State now or hereafter who has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard of this State or another state as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States; and "Satisfactory proof" means, in the case of a veteran, the applicant's DD-214, DD-215, or DD-256 form as issued by the federal government, or NGB-22 or other approved separation forms as outlined by all branches of the Armed Forces, or federal activation orders showing service under Title 10, section 672 or section 12301, of the United States Code, or a county-issued veteran identification card pursuant to P.L.2012, c.30 (C.40A:9-78.1 et seq.), or a veteran identification card as issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs under the "Veterans Identification Card Act of 2015," (38 U.S.C. s.5706). In the case of a discharged LGBTQ veteran, satisfactory proof also includes a copy of the eligibility form issued by the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). In the case of a Gold Star Family member, satisfactory proof includes any or all of the following: (1)   a certification from the Department of New Jersey of American Gold Star Mothers, Inc., or any other organization formed for the support of family members of members of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard, who lost their lives while on active duty for the United States, that the applicant is either the spouse, domestic partner, partner in a civil union, parent, brother, sister, child, legal guardian, or other legal custodian, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption, of a member of the armed forces or National Guard who died while on active duty for the United States; or (2)   (a) documentation deemed acceptable by the Adjutant General, including, but not limited to, a federal DD Form 1300, Report of Casualty, or a federal DD Form 2064, Certificate of Death Overseas, which identifies the member of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard who died while on active duty for the United States; and (b)   documentation indicating the applicant's relationship to the service member. (cf: P.L.2021, c.139, s.8) 14.  Section 1 of P.L.2017, c.19 (C.40:37A-114.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Disabled veteran" means any resident of the State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been or shall be declared by the United States Veterans Administration, or its successor, to have a service-connected disability. "Veteran" means any resident of the State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the [armed forces] Armed Forces of the United States, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, and is a resident of the State, or any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits. b.    In addition to any other federal or State law regarding providing a veteran's affordable housing preference, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall establish rules and regulations to provide a preference for affordable housing in a housing project, as defined under subsection f. of section 2 of P.L.1979, c.275 (C.40:37A-107), to homeless veterans, disabled veterans, and family members who are the primary residential caregivers to disabled veterans residing with them.  All applicants for the housing preference as specified herein shall also be required to meet the income requirements for admission to the housing project. c.     Among applicants eligible to receive a housing project preference provided under subsection b. of this section, priority for the preference shall be given to applicants as follows: (1) homeless veterans shall receive first priority; (2) disabled veterans shall receive second priority; and (3) family members who are the primary residential caregivers to disabled veterans residing with them shall receive third priority. (cf: P.L.2017, c.19, s.1) 15.  Section 1 of P.L.1955, c.49 (C.40:61-22.20) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  The governing body of any municipality bordering on the Atlantic Ocean, tidal water bays or rivers which owns or shall acquire, by any deed of dedication or otherwise, lands bordering on the ocean, tidal water bays or rivers, or easement rights therein, for a place of resort for public health and recreation and for other public purposes shall have the exclusive control, government and care thereof and of any boardwalk, bathing and recreational facilities, safeguards and equipment, now or hereafter constructed or provided thereon, and may, by ordinance, make and enforce rules and regulations for the government and policing of such lands, boardwalk, bathing facilities, safeguards and equipment; provided, that such power of control, government, care and policing shall not be construed in any manner to exclude or interfere with the operation of any State law or authority with respect to such lands, property and facilities.  Any such municipality may, in order to provide funds to improve, maintain and police the same and to protect the same from erosion, encroachment and damage by sea or otherwise, and to provide facilities and safeguards for public bathing and recreation, including the employment of lifeguards, by ordinance, make and enforce rules and regulations for the government, use, maintenance and policing thereof and provide for the charging and collecting of reasonable fees for the registration of persons using said lands and bathing facilities, for access to the beach and bathing and recreational grounds so provided and for the use of the bathing and recreational facilities, but no such fees shall be charged or collected from children under the age of 12 years. b.    A municipality may by ordinance provide that no fees, or reduced fees, shall be charged to: (1)   persons 65 or more years of age; (2)   persons who meet the disability criteria for disability benefits under Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.401 et seq.); (3)   persons in active military service in any of the Armed Forces of the United States and to their spouse or dependent children over the age of 12 years; (4)   persons who are active members of the New Jersey National Guard who have completed Initial Active Duty Training and to their spouse or dependent children over the age of 12 years. As used in this paragraph, "Initial Active Duty Training" means Basic Military Training, for members of the New Jersey Air National Guard, and Basic Combat Training and Advanced Individual Training, for members of the New Jersey Army National Guard; (5)   persons who have served in any of the Armed Forces of the United States and who were discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable and who either have served at least 90 days in active duty or have been discharged or released from active duty by reason of a service-incurred injury or disability. The Adjutant General of the New Jersey Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs shall promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to veteran eligibility under this paragraph; [and] (6)   persons holding a driver's license or identification card with a Gold Star Family designation issued pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.165 (C.39:3-10f6) or section 2 of P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.3), respectively; and (7)   persons who qualify as a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active duty in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, and to their spouse or dependent children over the age of 12 years. c.     A municipality providing for no fees or reduced fees pursuant to paragraph (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subsection b. of this section shall track, in a manner deemed appropriate by the governing body of the municipality, the number of persons who qualify under the provisions of those paragraphs. d.    A person who qualifies for free access to beaches and bathing and recreational grounds and free use of bathing and recreational facilities pursuant to paragraph (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subsection b. of this section may, in lieu of obtaining and presenting a municipal beach tag or similar admission pass to gain such access and use, present a DD-214, DD-215, or DD-256 form as issued by the federal government, NGB-22 or other approved separation forms as outlined by all branches of the Armed Forces, a county-issued veteran identification card pursuant to P.L.2012, c.30 (40A:9-78.1 et seq.), a veteran identification card as issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs under the "Veterans Identification Card Act of 2015," (38 U.S.C. 5706) or similar document, or eligibility form issued by the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or State driver's license or identification card indicating that the holder is a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Gold Star Family member. e.     A municipality that issues a permit to operate a motorized vehicle on a beach shall not charge a disabled veteran a fee to obtain, replace, or renew the permit. For purposes of this section, "disabled veteran" means any resident of the State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been declared by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, to have a service-connected disability of any degree. (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.7) 16.  Section 2 of P.L.2012, c.30 (C.40A:9-78.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act, P.L.2012, c.30 (C.40A:9-78.1 et seq.), "veteran" means any resident of this State now or hereafter who has served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof or the National Guard of this State or another State as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), and has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions from such service, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.8) 17.  Section 2 of P.L.2017, c.19 (C.40A:12A-20.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  As used in this section: "Disabled veteran" means any resident of the State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been or shall be declared by the United States Veterans Administration, or its successor, to have a service-connected disability. "Veteran" means any resident of the State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the [armed forces] Armed Forces of the United States, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, and is a resident of the State, or any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits. b.    In addition to any other federal or State law regarding providing a veteran's affordable housing preference, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall establish rules and regulations to provide a preference for affordable housing in a housing project to homeless veterans, disabled veterans, and family members who are the primary residential caregivers to disabled veterans residing with them.  All applicants for the housing preference as specified herein shall also be required to meet the income requirements for admission to the housing project. c.     Among applicants eligible to receive a housing project preference provided under subsection b. of this section, priority for the preference shall be given to applicants as follows: (1) homeless veterans shall receive first priority; (2) disabled veterans shall receive second priority; and (3) family members who are the primary residential caregivers to disabled veterans residing with them shall receive third priority. (cf: P.L.2017, c.19, s.2) 18.  Section 6 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.    As used in this act: a.     "Accumulated deductions" means the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the compensation of a member or contributed by or on behalf of the member, standing to the credit of the member's individual account in the annuity savings fund. b.    "Annuity" means payments for life derived from the accumulated deductions of a member as provided in this act. c.     "Annuity reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of an annuity, granted under the provisions of this act, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. d.    "Beneficiary" means any person receiving a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided in this act. e.     "Child" means a deceased member's unmarried child either (1) under the age of 18 or (2) of any age who, at the time of the member's death, is disabled because of an intellectual disability or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and the impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. f.     "Parent" shall mean the parent of a member who was receiving at least 1/2 of the parent's support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. g.    (1) "Widower," for employees of the State, means the man to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of her death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower will be considered terminated by marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widower," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the man to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married until the date of her death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower shall be considered terminated by marriage of the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. h.    (1) "Final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the three years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the five years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any five fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. i.     "Fiscal year" means any year commencing with July 1 and ending with June 30 next following. j.     "Medical board" shall mean the board of physicians provided for in section 17 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-17). k.    "Pension" means payments for life derived from appropriations made by the employer as provided in this act. l.     "Pension reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of a pension granted under the provisions of this act, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. m.   "Public Employees' Retirement System of New Jersey," hereinafter referred to as the "retirement system" or "system," is the corporate name of the arrangement for the payment of retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this act including the several funds placed under said system. By that name all of its business shall be transacted, its funds invested, warrants for money drawn, and payments made and all of its cash and securities and other property held. n.    "Regular interest" shall mean interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Directors of the Divisions of Investment and Pensions, the board of trustees and the actuary. It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of the assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus [3%] three percent, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below [6%] six percent. o.    "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. p.    "Veteran" means any honorably discharged officer, soldier, sailor, airman, marine or nurse who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War I, between July 14, 1914, and November 11, 1918, or who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who was inducted into such service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of such enlistment, and who did not, during or by reason of such service, renounce or lose United States citizenship, and any officer, soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk, who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, in any of the following wars, uprisings, insurrections, expeditions, or emergencies, and who has presented to the retirement system evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to said retirement system: (1)   The Indian wars and uprisings during any of the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as periods of active hostility; (2)   The Spanish-American War between April 20, 1898, and April 11, 1899; (3)   The Philippine insurrections and expeditions during the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as of active hostility from February 4, 1899, to the end of 1913; (4)   The Peking relief expedition between June 20, 1900, and May 27, 1902; (5)   The army of Cuban occupation between July 18, 1898, and May 20, 1902; (6)   The army of Cuban pacification between October 6, 1906, and April 1, 1909; (7)   The Mexican punitive expedition between March 14, 1916, and February 7, 1917; (8)   The Mexican border patrol, having actually participated in engagements against Mexicans between April 12, 1911, and June 16, 1919; (9)   World War I, between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918; (10)    World War II, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (11)    Korean conflict on or after June 23, 1950, and on or prior to January 31, 1955, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; and provided further, that any member classed as a veteran pursuant to this paragraph prior to August 1, 1966, shall continue to be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 90-day service between said dates as herein provided; (12)    Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 1, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (13)    Vietnam conflict on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided; (14)    Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15)    Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (16)    Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (17)    Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (18)    Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (19)    Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (20)    Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998 and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (21)    Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (22)    Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided. "Veteran" also means any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits. q.    (1)  "Widow," for employees of the State, means the woman to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of his death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow will be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widow," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the woman to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married until the date of his death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow shall be considered terminated by the marriage of the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widow" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. r.     (1) "Compensation" means the base or contractual salary, for services as an employee, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular workday or the regular work year. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, "compensation" means the amount of base or contractual salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as an employee, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular workday or the regular work year. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who at the time of enrollment in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 transfers service credit from another State-administered retirement system pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-14), but shall apply to a former member of the retirement system who has been granted a retirement allowance and is reenrolled in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1966, c.217 (C.43:15A-57.2) after becoming employed again in a position that makes the person eligible to be a member of the retirement system. In cases where salary includes maintenance, the retirement system shall fix the value of that part of the salary not paid in money which shall be considered under this act. For the period of July 1, 2009 through June 30, 2011, "contractual salary" for State employees shall include across the board negotiated wage increases under a collective negotiations agreement that were payable to all State employees covered by that agreement notwithstanding that, by amendment to that collective negotiations agreement, the effective date of the contractual increase has been deferred. For the purpose of this paragraph, "State employee" means an employee in the Executive Branch or the Judicial Branch of State government of New Jersey or an employee of the State University authorized to participate in the system under subsection b. of section 73 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-73), but shall not include employees of agencies authorized to participate in the system under subsections a., c., d., e., f., and g. of section 73 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-73) or under P.L.1990, c.25 (C.43:15A-73.2 et al.). For the period of July 1, 2009 through June 30, 2011, "contractual salary" for county and municipal employees shall include across the board negotiated wage increases under a collective negotiations agreement that were payable to all county or all municipal employees covered by that agreement notwithstanding that, by amendment to that collective negotiations agreement which has been filed with the Division of Pensions and Benefits, the effective date of the contractual increase has been deferred.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "county and municipal employees" means all persons employed by a county or municipality in this State. (cf: P.L.2010, c.50, s.71) 19.  Section 1 of P.L.1983, c.391 (C.43:16A-11.7) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For purposes of this act "veteran" means any honorably discharged officer, soldier, sailor, airman, marine or nurse who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War I, between July 14, 1914, and November 11, 1918, or who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who was inducted into such service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of such enlistment, and who did not, during or by reason of such service, renounce or lose United States citizenship, and any officer, soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk, who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, in any of the following wars, uprisings, insurrections, expeditions, or emergencies, and who has presented to the retirement system evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to said retirement system: (1)   The Indian wars and uprisings during any of the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as periods of active hostility; (2)   The Spanish-American War between April 20, 1898, and April 11, 1899; (3)   The Philippine insurrections and expeditions during the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as of active hostility from February 4, 1899, to the end of 1913; (4)   The Peking relief expedition between June 20, 1900, and May 27, 1902; (5)   The army of Cuban occupation between July 18, 1898, and May 20, 1902; (6)   The army of Cuban pacification between October 6, 1906, and April 1, 1909; (7)   The Mexican punitive expedition between March 14, 1916, and February 7, 1917; (8)   The Mexican border patrol, having actually participated in engagements against Mexicans between April 12, 1911, and June 16, 1919; (9)   World War I between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918; (10)    World War II, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (11)    Korean conflict on or after June 23, 1950, and on or prior to January 31, 1955, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; and provided further, that any member classed as a veteran pursuant to this subparagraph prior to August 1, 1966, shall continue to be classed as a veteran whether or not the member completed the 90-day service between said dates as herein provided; (12)    Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November l, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (13)    Vietnam conflict on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511 (d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided; (14)    Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15)    Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (16)    Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (17)    Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (18)    Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (19)    Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (20)    Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (21)    Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (22)    Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided. "Veteran" also means any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits. (cf: P.L.2005, c.64, s.4) 20.    Section 4 of P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.      a.  A person shall not be employed as a security officer by a security officer company or a company maintaining a proprietary or in-house security function, or perform the functions and activities of a security officer, unless that person is registered with the superintendent as required in this section. The requirements of this section shall not apply to: (1)   a loss prevention employee; (2)   an employee of a company whose business includes hosting sporting and entertainment events at an arena or stadium where a State, county, or municipal law enforcement agency is on the premises during the event and whose in-house security employees do not carry handguns or other licensed weapons; (3)   a security officer employed by a company maintaining a proprietary or in-house security function whose in-house security employees do not carry handguns or other licensed weapons; or (4)   a security employee regulated under federal law.  Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. b.    An application for registration as a security officer shall be filed with the superintendent on a form and in a manner prescribed by the superintendent and shall set forth under oath: (1)   the applicant's full name, age, which shall be at least 18 years, and residence; (2)   the name and address of all employers or occupations engaged in for the immediately preceding five years; (3)   that the applicant has not been convicted of any disqualifying crime or offense as set forth in subsection c. of this section; and (4)   such further information as the superintendent may require to show the good character, competency and integrity of the applicant. Any person who shall knowingly make a false statement in, or knowingly omit any material information from, an application as required by this subsection shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree in addition to any other crime or offense specified by law. c.     No person shall be issued a certificate of registration as a security officer under the provisions of this section if the person has been convicted, as indicated by a criminal history record background check performed pursuant to the provisions of this section, of:  a crime of the first, second, third or fourth degree; any offense involving the unlawful use, possession or sale of a controlled dangerous substance as defined in N.J.S.2C:35-2; or any offense where the registration of the individual would be contrary to the public interest, as determined by the superintendent, except as provided in subsection h. of this section. Each applicant shall submit to the superintendent the applicant's fingerprints and written consent for a criminal history record background check to be performed.  The superintendent shall compare these to fingerprints on file with the State Bureau of Identification in the Division of State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, consistent with applicable State and federal laws, rules and regulations.  The applicant shall bear the cost for the criminal history record background check, including all costs of administering and processing the check. d.    A person whose application has been approved by the superintendent shall complete the required education and training program established in section 5 of this act. Upon satisfactory completion of this program, and upon the payment of a fee in an amount established by the superintendent, the applicant shall be entitled to and the superintendent shall issue and deliver to the applicant a security officer certificate of registration. e.     The superintendent may revoke or suspend such certificate of registration for a violation of any of the provisions of this act or for other good cause.  A certificate of registration shall be surrendered to the superintendent within 72 hours after its term has expired or after notice in writing to the holder that the certificate of registration has been revoked. f.     The certificate of registration shall be renewed every two years by an applicant for an unarmed security officer position and each year by an applicant for an armed security officer position upon forms prescribed by the superintendent.  The applicant shall pay a fee in an amount established by the superintendent by rule and regulation and shall complete an eight-hour refresher course of classroom instruction taught by a certified security officer instructor.  The certificate of registration may be renewed without further investigation unless it is deemed by the superintendent that the applicant no longer qualifies or verified objections to the renewal are received by the superintendent prior to issuance. g.    The revocation or suspension of any certificate of registration by the superintendent shall be subject to notice and a hearing. h.    Notwithstanding subsection c. of this section, a veteran who has been convicted of a crime of the third or fourth degree, or a lesser offense involving the unlawful use, possession, or sale of a controlled dangerous substance as defined in N.J.S.2C:35-2, prior to service in the armed forces may be issued a certificate of registration as a security officer under the provisions of this section if the individual meets all other statutory requirements for registration, submits documentary evidence required by the superintendent demonstrating that he or she is a veteran, has not been convicted of any criminal offense since enlistment and acceptance in the armed forces, and the superintendent determines that the registration of the individual would not be contrary to the public interest. For purposes of this subsection, "veteran" means any person who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the [armed forces] Armed Forces of the United States, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States. (cf: P.L.2017, c.351, s.1) 21.  Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.206 (C.46:8-51) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  A landlord, or any agent thereof, shall count a military or veteran housing allowance, supported by United States Department of Veterans Affairs documentation, as income for purposes of determining whether a qualified prospective tenant meets any minimum income qualifications to rent housing from the landlord. b.    As used in this section: "Landlord" means any person who rents or leases or offers to rent or lease, for a term of at least one month, dwelling units. "Military" means the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, and Coast Guard, the National Guard and any other reserve component of the armed forces, and the merchant marine when organized under the federal law as a public military force. "Military or veteran housing allowance" means any federal housing allowance or stipend provided to a service member of the military or a veteran, including, but not limited to, the basic allowance for housing authorized pursuant to 37 U.S.C. s.403 and the housing stipend authorized pursuant to 38 U.S.C. s.3313. "Qualified prospective tenant" means any service member of the military or a veteran who is receiving a military or veteran housing allowance. "Veteran" means a person who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L. , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States. (cf: P.L.2019, c.206, s.1) 22.  Section 2 of P.L.2017, c.258 (C.52:27D-517) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: "Director" means the Director of the Division of Housing and Community Resources in the Department of Community Affairs. "Disabled" means a person who fulfills the definition of having a "disability" pursuant to section 3 of the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 42 U.S.C. s.12102. "Division" means the Division of Housing and Community Resources in the Department of Community Affairs. "Eligible veteran" means a disabled or low-income veteran. "Energy efficient features or equipment" means features or equipment within a primary residence that help to reduce the amount of electricity used to heat, cool, or ventilate the residence, including but not limited to insulation, weatherstripping, air sealing, repaired heating systems, or duct sealing. "Family member" means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. "Low-income veteran" means a veteran occupying a household with a gross household income equal to 50 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size, and within the same housing region, as defined by subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304). "Primary residence" means a dwelling unit that is owned by the eligible veteran or by a family member of the eligible veteran, and occupied by the eligible veteran as his or her principal residence. "Qualified organization" means a nonprofit veterans' organization that qualifies as a section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) tax exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code. "Veteran" means any resident of the State now or hereafter who has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard of this State or another state as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), or any discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits. (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.12) 23.  Section 2 of P.L.2011, c.147 (C.52:32-50) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority. "Contracting agency" means the State or any board, commission, authority or agency of the State. "Department" means the New Jersey Department of the Treasury. "Veteran" means any resident of this State now or hereafter who has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions who served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and is a citizen and resident of this State, or the National Guard of this State or another state as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.109 (C.38A:1-1), and shall include disabled veterans. "Veteran-owned business" means a business that has its principal place of business in the State, is independently owned and operated and at least 51 percent of the business is owned and controlled by persons who are veterans. (cf: P.L.2019, c.500, s.13) 24.  Section 3 of P.L.1965, c.89 (C.53:5A-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: a.     "Aggregate contributions" means the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the salary of a member or contributed by him or on his behalf, standing to the credit of his individual account in the Annuity Savings Fund.  Interest credited on contributions to the former "State Police Retirement and Benevolent Fund" shall be included in a member's aggregate contributions. b.    "Annuity" means payments for life derived from the aggregate contributions of a member. c.     "Annuity reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of an annuity, computed upon the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts and regular interest. d.    "Beneficiary" means any person entitled to receive any benefit pursuant to the provisions of this act by reason of the death of a member or retirant. e.     "Board of trustees" or "board" means the board provided for in section 30 of this act. f.     "Child" means a deceased member's or retirant's unmarried child either (a) under the age of 18, or (b) 18 years of age or older and enrolled in a secondary school, or (c) under the age of 24 and enrolled in a degree program in an institution of higher education for at least 12 credit hours in each semester, provided that the member died in active service as a result of an accident met in the actual performance of duty at some definite time and place, and the death was not the result of the member's willful misconduct, or (d) of any age who, at the time of the member's or retirant's death, is disabled because of an intellectual disability or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and his impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. g.    "Creditable service" means service rendered for which credit is allowed on the basis of contributions made by the member or the State. h.    "Parent" means the parent of a member who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death.  The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. i.     (1)  "Final compensation" means the average compensation received by the member in the last 12 months of creditable service preceding his retirement or death.  Such term includes the value of the member's maintenance allowance for this same period. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary.  Such term includes the value of the member's maintenance allowance for this same period. j.     (1)  "Final salary" means the average salary received by the member in the last 12 months of creditable service preceding his retirement or death.  Such term shall not include the value of the member's maintenance allowance. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final salary" means the average annual salary for service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary.  Such term shall not include the value of the member's maintenance allowance. k.    "Fiscal year" means any year commencing with July 1 and ending with June 30 next following. l.     "Medical board" means the board of physicians provided for in section 30 of this act. m.   "Member" means any full-time, commissioned officer, non-commissioned officer or trooper of the Division of State Police of the Department of Law and Public Safety of the State of New Jersey enrolled in the retirement system established by this act. n.    "Pension" means payment for life derived from contributions by the State. o.    "Pension reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of any pension computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as shall be adopted by the board of trustees and regular interest. p.    "Regular interest" means interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Directors of the Divisions of Investment and Pensions, the board of trustees and the actuary.  It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of the assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus [3%] three percent, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below [6%] six percent. q.    "Retirant" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance as provided by this act. r.     "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. s.     "State Police Retirement System of New Jersey," herein also referred to as the "retirement system" or "system," is the corporate name of the arrangement for the payment of retirement allowances and of the benefits under the provisions of this act including the several funds placed under said system.  By that name, all of its business shall be transacted, its funds invested, warrants for moneys drawn, and payments made and all of its cash and securities and other property held.  All assets held in the name of the former "State Police Retirement and Benevolent Fund" shall be transferred to the retirement system established by this act. t.     "Surviving spouse" means the person to whom a member or a retirant was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), on the date of the death of the member or retirant. The dependency of such a surviving spouse will be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the surviving spouse subsequent to the member's or the retirant's death, except that in the event of the payment of accidental death benefits, pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1965, c.89 (C.53:5A-14), the dependency of such a surviving spouse or domestic partner will not be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the surviving spouse subsequent to the member's death. u.    (1) "Compensation" for purposes of computing pension contributions means the base salary, for services as a member as defined in this act, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the State for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary duties beyond the regular workday or shift. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "compensation" means the amount of base salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as a member as defined in this act, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the State for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary duties beyond the regular workday or shift. v.    "Veteran" means any person who has served in the United States Armed Forces and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in any of the following wars or emergencies, and who has presented to the retirement system evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to the retirement system: (1)   Vietnam conflict on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511 (d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided; (2)   Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (3)   Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (4)   Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (5)   Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (6)   Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (7)   Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (8)   Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (9)   Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (10)    Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided. (cf: P.L.2016, c.26, s.1) 25.  Section 1 of P.L.1963, c.171 (C.54:4-8.10) is amended to read as follows: 1.    (a)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2019, c.413) (b)   "Assessor" means the assessor, board of assessors or any other official or body of a taxing district charged with the duty of assessing real and personal property for the purpose of general taxation. (c)   "Collector" means the collector or receiver of taxes of a taxing district. (d)   "Honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service " means and includes every form of separation from active, full-time duty with military or naval pay and allowances in some branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, other than those marked "dishonorable," "undesirable," "bad conduct," "by sentence of general court martial," "by sentence of summary court martial" or similar expression indicating that the discharge or release was not under honorable circumstances.  A disenrollment certificate or other form of release terminating temporary service in a military or naval branch of the armed forces rendered on a voluntary and part-time basis without pay, or a release from or deferment of induction into the active military or naval service shall not be deemed to be included in the aforementioned phrase. (e)   "Pre-tax year" means the particular calendar year immediately preceding the "tax year." (f)   "Resident" means one legally domiciled within the State of New Jersey.  Mere seasonal or temporary residence within the State, of whatever duration, shall not constitute domicile within the State for the purposes of this act.  Absence from this State for a period of 12 months shall be prima facie evidence of abandonment of domicile in this State. The burden of establishing legal domicile within the State shall be upon the claimant. (g)   "Tax year" means the particular calendar year in which the general property tax is due and payable. (h)   "Veteran" means any citizen and resident of this State honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances, or a discharged LGBTQ veteran, as defined in section 1 of P.L.    , c.  (C.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and is a citizen and resident of this State, from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States. (i)    "Veteran's deduction" means the deduction against the taxes payable by any person, allowable pursuant to this act. (j)    "Surviving spouse" means the surviving wife or husband of any of the following, while he or she is a resident of this State, during widowhood or widowerhood: 1.    A citizen and resident of this State who has died or shall die while on active duty in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States; or 2.    A citizen and resident of this State who has had or shall hereafter have active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who died or shall die while on active duty in a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States; or 3.    A citizen and resident of this State who has been or may hereafter be honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States. (k)   "Cooperative" means a housing corporation or association incorporated or organized under the laws of New Jersey which entitles a shareholder thereof to possess and occupy for dwelling purposes a house, apartment or other structure owned or leased by the corporation or association. (l)    "Mutual housing corporation" means a corporation not-for-profit incorporated under the laws of New Jersey on a mutual or cooperative basis within the scope of section 607 of the "National Defense Housing Act," Pub.L.76-849 (42 U.S.C.s.1521 et seq.), which acquired a National Defense Housing Project pursuant to that act. (m)  "Continuing care retirement community" means a residential facility primarily for retired persons where lodging and nursing, medical or other health related services at the same or another location are provided as continuing care to a resident of the facility pursuant to an agreement effective for the life of the resident and in consideration of the payment of an entrance fee with or without other periodic charges, which agreement requires the individual to bear a share of the property taxes that are assessed upon the continuing care retirement community, if a share is attributable to the unit that the resident occupies. (cf: P.L.2019, c.413, s.3) 26.  This act shall take effect immediately.